Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.308

[Art. 30] Charges and specifications.

(1) Charges and specifications shall be signed by a person subject to this code under oath before a person authorized by this code to administer oaths and shall state:

(a) That the signer has personal knowledge of, or has investigated, the matters set forth therein; and

(b) That they are true in fact to the best of his or her knowledge and belief.

(2) Upon the preferring of charges, the proper authority shall take immediate steps to determine what disposition should be made thereof in the interest of justice and discipline, and the person accused shall be informed of the charges against him or her as soon as practicable.

[ 1989 c 48 s 29; 1963 c 220 s 32.]